Wyoming, session 2025, HB0051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 5-6-201(a), 5-6-210(a) and 5-6-301(a)
are amended to read:

5-6-201. Jurisdiction of municipal judge; change of
venue prohibited; exception for certain civil penalties.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, a municipal judge has exclusive jurisdiction over
all violations of ordinances of the city. The municipal
judge shall hear and determine violations of ordinances and
HB0051

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0218
may impose fines not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00) one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment
not exceeding six (6) months one (1) year, or both, to
which may be added costs. No change of venue shall be
granted in any case arising under the ordinances of the
city.

5-6-210. Punishment regulated by ordinance; maximum
fine and imprisonment.

(a) Any person convicted by a municipal judge of any
offense under any ordinance of the city shall be punished
by fine or imprisonment or both as provided by ordinance.
Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no
fine shall exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for any one (1) offense
recoverable with costs, and no imprisonment shall exceed
six (6) months one (1) year.

5-6-301. Punishment of persons convicted before
judge; maximum penalty permitted; power to punish for
contempt.

HB0051

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0218
(a) A person convicted before a municipal judge shall
be fined and imprisoned as provided by ordinance. Except as
provided by W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xli) or subsection (c) of this
section, no fine shall exceed seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00) one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), and no
imprisonment shall exceed six (6) months one (1) year.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0051